Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Uniform Flag Law

§ 1901.
Definition.

The words flag, standard, color, ensign, or shield, as used in this subchapter, shall include any flag, standard, color, ensign, or shield, or copy, picture, or representation thereof, made of any substance or represented or produced thereon, and of any size, evidently purporting to be such flag, standard, color, ensign, or shield of the United States or of this State, or a copy, picture, or representation thereof.

§ 1902.
Display.

A person shall not, in any manner, for exhibition or display:

Place or cause to be placed any word, figure, mark, picture, design, drawing, or advertisement of any nature upon any flag, standard, color, ensign, or shield of the United States or of this State, or authorized by any law of the United States or of this State;

Expose to public view any such flag, standard, color, ensign, or shield upon which shall have been printed, painted, or otherwise produced, or to which shall have been attached, appended, affixed, or annexed any such word, figure, mark, picture, design, drawing, or advertisement; or

Expose to public view for sale, manufacture, or otherwise, or sell, give or have in possession for sale, for gift, or for use for any purpose any substance, being an article of merchandise, or receptacle, or thing for holding or carrying merchandise, upon or to which shall have been produced or attached any such flag, standard, color, ensign, or shield, in order to advertise, call attention to, decorate, mark, or distinguish such article or substance.

§ 1903.
Illegal acts.

A person shall not publicly mutilate, deface, defile, defy, trample upon, or by word or act cast contempt upon any such flag, standard, color, ensign, or shield.

§ 1904.
Construction.

This subchapter shall not apply to any act permitted by the statutes of the United States, or of this State, or by the U.S. Army and Navy regulations, nor shall it apply to any printed or written document or production, stationery, ornament, picture, or jewelry whereon shall be depicted such flag, standard, color, ensign, or shield with no design or words thereon and disconnected with any advertisement.

HISTORY:

Amended 1964, No. 23 (Sp. Sess.), eff. March 9, 1964; 1991, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1904a.
Use of State Seal and Coat of Arms.

The State Seal and Coat of Arms may be used for commemorative medals or for public displays not connected with any advertising, provided that:

the use does not imply State endorsement or approval when none has been given; and

a sample of the medal or display is delivered to the Secretary of State prior to manufacture, distribution, or sale.

HISTORY:

Added 1991, No. 222 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1905.
Penalty.

A person who violates any provision of this subchapter shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

§ 1906.
Uniform interpretation.

This subchapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose and to make uniform the laws of the states which enact it.